Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 5 Department of Transportation
A requirement that within the later of: (I) Twelve (12) months after the University’s purchase of the transfer parcels; or (II) Three (3) months after the state shall have completed installation of normal and usual infrastructure improvements to adequately service the transfer parcels (including water supply, sanitary and storm sewer connections, and provisions for all other necessary utilities) as well as the installation of paving, sidewalks, and curbing necessary to reconstitute Friendship Street, the University shall construct a new building and complete the construction within three (3) years from the commencement of said construction, on the block bounded by Friendship, East Franklin, Pine, and Chestnut Streets which shall be designed to accept retail uses on the first floor and no part of which will be used for student housing.

A requirement that development of the transfer parcels by the University shall be in accordance with applicable ordinances of the city of Providence, as amended from time to time, including, but not limited to, matters of zoning and planning, by departments and agencies of the city of Providence having jurisdiction thereover.

Use of proceeds. Upon the conveyance or lease of any parcel of I-195 surplus land as set forth in this section or the transfer parcels referenced in subsection (c), the received proceeds of such sale or lease shall be used by the State of Rhode Island department of transportation for the relocation of I-195 and work related thereto and otherwise in conformance with all applicable laws, rules and regulations. In accordance with the findings of the I-195 Redevelopment Act of 2011 in chapter 42-64.14 of the general laws, use of the anticipated proceeds from the sale of the land is a key element of the plan of finance for completion of the I-195 relocation project, and vital to making the land usable for future development.

The provisions of sections 3, 4, 5 and 9 of chapter 7 of this title, shall not be applicable to the transactions authorized by this §

37-5-8

which have been or hereafter may be affected by the director of the Rhode Island department of transportation in the name of and for the State of Rhode Island under the provisions of this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, no restriction shall apply to and no further approval, determination or action of any kind shall be required to effect any conveyance of any real property identified in this section by the director of the Rhode Island department of transportation in the name of and for the State of Rhode Island.

Nothing herein shall be construed to limit or modify the applicability of §

37-7-6

to any or all of the I-195 surplus land.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 2.